Massachusetts, session 194th, H928.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the 
following new chapter:  
An Act for environmental, and water testing requirements, and funding thereof. 
1.) It being important for the public health, and safety, various environmental, and water 
testing requirements, have been developed, by statute, regulatory actions, and various 
circumstances. Challenged public revenues, and circumstances, from time to time, mean that 
testing is delayed, even when it is having effect on individuals, businesses, or organizations. It is 
in the interests of such circumstances, to encourage, and further enable, needed actions, and that 
is the purpose of this legislation.  
2.) All environmental, and water testing required by law, shall be enforced, and 
enforceable; by appropriate funding, from public budgets, appropriate private compensations, 
and when needed, by appropriate court order. 

of 2 13  3.) Since such testing is vital, if funding from public sources, does not appear to be fully 
sufficient, at a particular time, or times, to provide for such testing, as is legal, and necessary, 
other resources, may be expended, as described in this statute. 
4.) Such testing may have alternative financing, for testing, by one or more, of several 
mechanisms: 
Voluntary contributions, and/or agreed-upon funding, transferred from one or more 
individual persons, property owners, organizations, and/or others, may be accessed, specifically 
to meet the need for, and to conduct legally defined, and/or needed testings.  
Reasonable required testing, shall be reimbursable by a Tax Donation Credit (TDC); 
which shall be certifiable, in a document that states the nature of required testings, being 
performed according to legal standards, and/or needed circumstance. This Credit, would be 
useable on legally filed tax returns, only by the individual, and/or organization, bearing the cost 
of needed testing, which would otherwise be performed, by public budget expenditure. 
5.) Such testing, if advanced in schedule, by the means of this legislation, can be 
authorized by the appropriate jurisdictional authorities; if there is unreasonable delay, a person 
with standing, in relation to the particular site, may seek an appropriate court order, to obtain 
such reasonable testing, when it is in sufficient public interest.